Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.520.020

Distribution of forest reserve funds—Revolving account created—Use—Apportionments from—As affects basic education allocation.

(1) There shall be a fund known as the federal forest revolving account. The state treasurer, who shall be custodian of the revolving account, shall deposit into the revolving account the funds for each county received by the state in accordance with Title 16, section 500, United States Code. The state treasurer shall distribute these moneys to the counties according to the determined proportional area. The county legislative authority shall expend fifty percent of the money for the benefit of the public roads and other public purposes as authorized by federal statute or public schools of such county and not otherwise. Disbursements by the counties of the remaining fifty percent of the money shall be as authorized by the superintendent of public instruction, or the superintendent's designee, and shall occur in the manner provided in subsection (2) of this section.

(2) No later than thirty days following receipt of the funds from the federal government, the superintendent of public instruction shall apportion moneys distributed to counties for schools to public school districts in the respective counties in proportion to the number of resident full-time equivalent students enrolled in each public school district to the number of resident full-time equivalent students enrolled in public schools in the county. In apportioning these funds, the superintendent of public instruction shall utilize the October enrollment count.

(3)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, if the amount received by any public school district pursuant to subsection (2) of this section is less than the basic education allocation to which the district would otherwise be entitled, the superintendent of public instruction shall apportion to the district, in the manner provided by RCW 28A.510.250, an amount which shall be the difference between the amount received pursuant to subsection (2) of this section and the basic education allocation to which the district would otherwise be entitled.

(b) If a school district has a poverty level of at least fifty-seven percent, the superintendent may not offset that district's basic education allocation by the amount of those federal forest revenues, to the extent that such revenues do not exceed seventy thousand dollars. The superintendent may offset the district's basic education allocations by the portion of the federal forest revenues that exceeds seventy thousand dollars. For purposes of this section, poverty is measured by the percentage of students eligible for free and reduced-price lunch in the previous school year.

(4) All federal forest funds shall be expended in accordance with the requirements of Title 16, section 500, United States Code, as now existing or hereafter amended.

(5) The definition of resident student for purposes of this section shall be based on rules adopted by the superintendent of public instruction, which shall consider and address the impact of alternative learning experience students on federal forest funds distribution.

[ 2014 c 155 s 2; 2011 c 278 s 1; 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 113; 1990 c 33 s 430; 1985 c 311 s 2; 1982 c 126 s 2. Formerly RCW 28A.02.310.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2014 c 155: "This act takes effect September 1, 2014." [ 2014 c 155 s 3.]

Effective date—2011 c 278 s 1: "Section 1 of this act takes effect September 1, 2011." [ 2011 c 278 s 3.]

Rules—2011 c 278: "The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to implement RCW 28A.520.020 that take effect September 1, 2011." [ 2011 c 278 s 2.]

Effective dates—Severability—1991 sp.s. c 13: See notes following RCW 18.08.240.

Effective date—Severability—1982 c 126: See notes following RCW 28A.520.010.